New Jersey, session 221, S676.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The State of New Jersey officially recognizes the Sandhill Indian Tribe of Neptune, New Jersey as an American Indian Tribe for the limited purpose of assisting the tribe in: establishing eligibility for federal education, job training, and housing benefits and federal protection for the sale of artwork; qualifying for public and private grants for which Indian tribes or groups, or members thereof, may be eligible; protecting the ability of the tribe and its members to engage in traditional religious practices and ceremonies; preserving and protecting burial sites and artifacts; and ensuring that handicrafts made by tribal members may be sold as Indian made. b.    Nothing in this section shall be construed or interpreted as conferring recognition for any purpose except as expressly stated in subsection a. of this section, or as evidence that a tribe has a State compact or State approval for the purposes of the federal Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, 25 U.S.C. s.2701 et seq.  The limited State recognition accorded to the tribe named in subsection a. of this section shall not be construed to affect in any way a tribe or groups case for federal recognition, shall not confer the right upon any tribe, group, or individual to conduct gambling of any kind or to engage in the sale of motor fuels or tobacco, and shall not constitute an acknowledgement of any claim by any tribe, group, or individual to any ancestral, tribal or other public or private lands. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.